Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1168.
do enact as follows:SB1168,14Section 1. 16.037 of the statutes is created to read:SB1168,2,2516.037 Leadership in energy and environmental design certification 1grant program. (1) Definition. In this section, “municipality” means a city, 2village, or town.SB1168,2,83(2) Grant program. The department shall establish and administer a grant 4program under which the department shall award grants to municipalities and 5community organizations in this state for the purpose of assisting municipalities 6and community organizations to obtain from the Green Building Certification 7Institute leadership in energy and environmental design certifications for 8municipal and community buildings.SB1168,29Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 10insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1168,317Section 3. 20.505 (1) (cp) of the statutes is created to read:SB1168,2,211820.505 (1) (cp) Leadership in energy and environmental design certification 19grant program. As a continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the 20leadership in energy and environmental design certification grant program under 21s. 16.037.SB1168,2,2222